dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX F. Y 72
SFX F. 0 0 . 11
SFX F. 0 s [eë] 12
SFX F. e 0 [éiï]e 13
SFX F. e s [éiï]e 14
SFX F. rice eur [dt]rice 13
SFX F. rice eurs [dt]rice 14
SFX F. de d de 13
SFX F. de ds de 14
SFX F. ffe f ffe 13
SFX F. ffe fs ffe 14
SFX F. ofe of ofe 13
SFX F. ofe ofs ofe 14
SFX F. anche anc anche 13
SFX F. anche ancs anche 14
SFX F. èche ec èche 13
SFX F. èche ecs èche 14
SFX F. aiche ais aiche 15
SFX F. aîche ais aîche 15
SFX F. khe kh khe 13
SFX F. khe khs khe 14
SFX F. he h [ut]he 13
SFX F. he hs [ut]he 14
SFX F. ke k ke 13
SFX F. ke ks ke 14
SFX F. le l [aiouû]le 13
SFX F. le ls [aiouû]le 14
SFX F. lle l [eiu]lle 13
SFX F. lle ls [eiu]lle 14
SFX F. ne n [aiou]ne 13
SFX F. ne ns [aiou]ne 14
SFX F. nne n [aeo]nne 13
SFX F. nne ns [aeo]nne 14
SFX F. igne in igne 13
SFX F. igne ins igne 14
SFX F. re r [aiuûy]re 13
SFX F. re rs [aiuûy]re 14
SFX F. ère er ère 13
SFX F. ère ers ère 14
SFX F. se s [^us]se 15
SFX F. esse e [^eo].esse 13
SFX F. esse es [^eo].esse 14
SFX F. eresse eur eresse 13
SFX F. eresse eurs eresse 14
SFX F. oresse eur oresse 13
SFX F. oresse eurs oresse 14
SFX F. sse s [^e]sse 15
SFX F. use us [^eo]use 15
SFX F. euse eur euse 13
SFX F. euse eurs euse 14
SFX F. te t [^èt]te 13
SFX F. te ts [^èt]te 14
SFX F. tte t tte 13
SFX F. tte ts tte 14
SFX F. ète et ète 13
SFX F. ète ets ète 14
SFX F. ue u [^gq]ue 13
SFX F. ue us [^gq]ue 14
SFX F. gue g gue 13
SFX F. gue gs gue 14
SFX F. cque c cque 13
SFX F. cque cs cque 14
SFX F. que c [^c]que 13
SFX F. que cs [^c]que 14
SFX F. ève ef ève 13
SFX F. ève efs ève 14
SFX F. ve f [iïu]ve 13
SFX F. ve fs [iïu]ve 14
SFX F. uë u uë 13
SFX F. uë us uë 14
SFX F. üe u üe 13
SFX F. üe us üe 14
SFX F. ze z ze 15

SFX W. N 8
SFX W. 0 0 . 11
SFX W. e es e 12
SFX W. ce x ce 15
SFX W. use ux [eo]use 15
SFX W. ausse aux ausse 15
SFX W. ousse oux ousse 15
SFX W. ale al ale 13
SFX W. ale aux ale 14

SFX S* Y 2
SFX S* 0 0/1 [^sxz] 9
SFX S* 0 s/2 [^sxz] 10

SFX X* Y 4
SFX X* 0 0/1 . 9
SFX X* 0 x/2 [aeoœ]u 10
SFX X* l ux/2 al 10
SFX X* il ux/2 ail 10

SFX A* Y 16
SFX A* an an/1 an 9
SFX A* an en/2 an 10
SFX A* f f/1 f 9
SFX A* f ves/2 f 10
SFX A* h h/1 h 9
SFX A* h hes/2 h 10
SFX A* s s/1 s 9
SFX A* s ses/2 s 10
SFX A* x h/1 x 9
SFX A* x hes/2 x 10
SFX A* y y/1 y 9
SFX A* y ies/2 y 10
SFX A* zz zz/1 zz 9
SFX A* zz zzes/2 zz 10
SFX A* z z/1 [^z]z 9
SFX A* z zzes/2 [^z]z 10

SFX I* Y 12
SFX I* a a/1 a 9
SFX I* a e/2 a 10
SFX I* e e/1 e 9
SFX I* e i/2 e 10
SFX I* en en/1 en 9
SFX I* en ina/2 en 10
SFX I* o o/1 o 9
SFX I* o i/2 o 10
SFX I* um um/1 um 9
SFX I* um a/2 um 10
SFX I* us us/1 us 9
SFX I* us i/2 us 10

SFX F* Y 63
SFX F* 0 0/1 . 11
SFX F* 0 s/2 [eë] 12
SFX F* e 0/1 [éiï]e 13
SFX F* e s/2 [éiï]e 14
SFX F* rice eur/1 [dt]rice 13
SFX F* rice eurs/2 [dt]rice 14
SFX F* de d/1 de 13
SFX F* de ds/2 de 14
SFX F* ffe f/1 ffe 13
SFX F* ffe fs/2 ffe 14
SFX F* ofe of/1 ofe 13
SFX F* ofe ofs/2 ofe 14
SFX F* he h/1 [ut]he 13
SFX F* he hs/2 [ut]he 14
SFX F* èke ek/1 èke 13
SFX F* èke eks/2 èke 14
SFX F* le l/1 [aiouû]le 13
SFX F* le ls/2 [aiouû]le 14
SFX F* lle l/1 [eiu]lle 13
SFX F* lle ls/2 [eiu]lle 14
SFX F* ne n/1 [aiou]ne 13
SFX F* ne ns/2 [aiou]ne 14
SFX F* nne n/1 [aeo]nne 13
SFX F* nne ns/2 [aeo]nne 14
SFX F* gne n/1 igne 13
SFX F* gne ns/2 igne 14
SFX F* re r/1 [aiuûy]re 13
SFX F* re rs/2 [aiuûy]re 14
SFX F* ère er/1 ère 13
SFX F* ère ers/2 ère 14
SFX F* se s/1 [^us]se 15
SFX F* esse e/1 [^eo].esse 13
SFX F* esse es/2 [^eo].esse 14
SFX F* eresse eur/1 eresse 13
SFX F* eresse eurs/2 eresse 14
SFX F* oresse eur/1 oresse 13
SFX F* oresse eurs/2 oresse 14
SFX F* sse s/1 [^e]sse 15
SFX F* use us/1 [^eo]use 15
SFX F* euse eur/1 euse 13
SFX F* euse eurs/2 euse 14
SFX F* te t/1 [^èt]te 13
SFX F* te ts/2 [^èt]te 14
SFX F* tte t/1 tte 13
SFX F* tte ts/2 tte 14
SFX F* ète et/1 ète 13
SFX F* ète ets/2 ète 14
SFX F* ue u/1 [^gq]ue 13
SFX F* ue us/2 [^gq]ue 14
SFX F* gue g/1 gue 13
SFX F* gue gs/2 gue 14
SFX F* cque c/1 cque 13
SFX F* cque cs/2 cque 14
SFX F* que c/1 [^c]que 13
SFX F* que cs/2 [^c]que 14
SFX F* ève ef/1 ève 13
SFX F* ève efs/2 ève 14
SFX F* ve f/1 [iïu]ve 13
SFX F* ve fs/2 [iïu]ve 14
SFX F* uë u/1 uë 13
SFX F* uë us/2 uë 14
SFX F* üe u/1 üe 13
SFX F* üe us/2 üe 14

SFX W* Y 7
SFX W* 0 0/1 . 11
SFX W* e es/2 e 12
SFX W* ce x/1 ce 15
SFX W* use ux/1 [eo]use 15
SFX W* ousse oux/1 ousse 15
SFX W* ale al/1 ale 13
SFX W* ale aux/2 ale 14

PFX Um Y 29
PFX Um 0 0/3 .
PFX Um 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 1
PFX Um 0 d'/4 [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 2
PFX Um 0 yotta/4 .
PFX Um 0 zetta/4 .
PFX Um 0 exa/4 .
PFX Um 0 l'exa () 1
PFX Um 0 d'exa/4 . 2
PFX Um 0 péta/4 .
PFX Um 0 téra/4 .
PFX Um 0 giga/4 .
PFX Um 0 méga/4 .
PFX Um 0 kilo/4 .
PFX Um 0 hecto/4 .
PFX Um 0 l'hecto . 1
PFX Um 0 d'hecto/4 . 2
PFX Um 0 déca/4 .
PFX Um 0 déci/4 .
PFX Um 0 centi/4 .
PFX Um 0 milli/4 .
PFX Um 0 micro/4 .
PFX Um 0 nano/4 .
PFX Um 0 pico/4 .
PFX Um 0 femto/4 .
PFX Um 0 atto/4 .
PFX Um 0 l'atto . 1
PFX Um 0 d'atto/4 . 2
PFX Um 0 zepto/4 .
PFX Um 0 yocto/4 .

PFX Ui Y 29
PFX Ui 0 0 .
PFX Ui 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 1
PFX Ui 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 2
PFX Ui 0 yotta .
PFX Ui 0 zetta .
PFX Ui 0 exa .
PFX Ui 0 l'exa . 1
PFX Ui 0 d'exa . 2
PFX Ui 0 péta .
PFX Ui 0 téra .
PFX Ui 0 giga .
PFX Ui 0 méga .
PFX Ui 0 kilo .
PFX Ui 0 hecto .
PFX Ui 0 l'hecto . 1
PFX Ui 0 d'hecto . 2
PFX Ui 0 déca .
PFX Ui 0 déci .
PFX Ui 0 centi .
PFX Ui 0 milli .
PFX Ui 0 micro .
PFX Ui 0 nano .
PFX Ui 0 pico .
PFX Ui 0 femto .
PFX Ui 0 atto .
PFX Ui 0 l'atto . 1
PFX Ui 0 d'atto . 2
PFX Ui 0 zepto .
PFX Ui 0 yocto .

PFX U. Y 20
PFX U. 0 Y .
PFX U. 0 Z .
PFX U. 0 E .
PFX U. 0 P .
PFX U. 0 T .
PFX U. 0 G .
PFX U. 0 M .
PFX U. 0 k .
PFX U. 0 h .
PFX U. 0 da .
PFX U. 0 d .
PFX U. 0 c .
PFX U. 0 m .
PFX U. 0 µ .
PFX U. 0 n .
PFX U. 0 p .
PFX U. 0 f .
PFX U. 0 a .
PFX U. 0 z .
PFX U. 0 y .

PFX n' Y 1
PFX n' 0 n' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 16

PFX q' Y 1
PFX q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 3

PFX d' Y 1
PFX d' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 2

PFX j' Y 1
PFX j' 0 j' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 17

PFX c' Y 2
PFX c' 0 c' [eé] 18
PFX c' 0 ç' a 18

PFX l' Y 1
PFX l' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 1

PFX m' Y 1
PFX m' 0 m' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 19

PFX t' Y 1
PFX t' 0 t' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 20

PFX s' Y 1
PFX s' 0 s' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 21

SFX zA Y 52
SFX zA voir voir/5 avoir 22
SFX zA voir yant/6 avoir 23
SFX zA avoir eu avoir 24
SFX zA avoir eus avoir 25
SFX zA avoir eue avoir 26
SFX zA avoir eues avoir 27
SFX zA voir i/7 avoir 28
SFX zA voir s/6 avoir 29
SFX zA voir 0/8 avoir 30
SFX zA voir vons/9 avoir 31
SFX zA voir vez/10 avoir 32
SFX zA avoir ont/6 avoir 33
SFX zA voir vais/11 avoir 34
SFX zA voir vais/6 avoir 35
SFX zA voir vait/8 avoir 36
SFX zA voir vions/9 avoir 37
SFX zA voir viez/10 avoir 38
SFX zA voir vaient/6 avoir 39
SFX zA avoir eus/11 avoir 40
SFX zA avoir eussè-je avoir 41
SFX zA avoir eus/6 avoir 42
SFX zA avoir eut/8 avoir 43
SFX zA avoir eûmes/9 avoir 44
SFX zA avoir eûtes/10 avoir 45
SFX zA avoir eurent/6 avoir 46
SFX zA voir urai/11 avoir 47
SFX zA voir uras/6 avoir 48
SFX zA voir ura/6 avoir 49
SFX zA voir urons/9 avoir 50
SFX zA voir urez/10 avoir 51
SFX zA voir uront/6 avoir 52
SFX zA voir urais/11 avoir 53
SFX zA voir urais/6 avoir 54
SFX zA voir urait/6 avoir 55
SFX zA voir urions/9 avoir 56
SFX zA voir uriez/10 avoir 57
SFX zA voir uraient/6 avoir 58
SFX zA voir ie/12 avoir 59
SFX zA voir ies/13 avoir 60
SFX zA voir it/6 avoir 61
SFX zA voir yons/14 avoir 62
SFX zA voir yez/15 avoir 63
SFX zA voir ient/6 avoir 64
SFX zA avoir eusse/11 avoir 65
SFX zA avoir eusses/6 avoir 66
SFX zA avoir eût/8 avoir 67
SFX zA avoir eussions/9 avoir 68
SFX zA avoir eussiez/10 avoir 69
SFX zA avoir eussent/6 avoir 70
SFX zA voir ie/16 avoir 71
SFX zA voir yons/16 avoir 72
SFX zA voir yez/16 avoir 73

SFX zE Y 49
SFX zE tre tre/17 être 22
SFX zE être étant/18 être 23
SFX zE être été être 74
SFX zE être suis être 28
SFX zE être es/6 être 29
SFX zE être est/19 être 30
SFX zE être sommes être 31
SFX zE tre tes/10 être 32
SFX zE être sont être 33
SFX zE être étais/11 être 34
SFX zE être étais/6 être 35
SFX zE être était/19 être 36
SFX zE être étions/9 être 37
SFX zE être étiez/10 être 38
SFX zE être étaient/19 être 39
SFX zE être fus être 40
SFX zE être fussè-je être 41
SFX zE être fus être 42
SFX zE être fut être 43
SFX zE être fûmes être 44
SFX zE être fûtes être 45
SFX zE être furent être 46
SFX zE être serai être 47
SFX zE être seras être 48
SFX zE être sera être 49
SFX zE être serons être 50
SFX zE être serez être 51
SFX zE être seront être 52
SFX zE être serais être 53
SFX zE être serais être 54
SFX zE être serait être 55
SFX zE être serions être 56
SFX zE être seriez être 57
SFX zE être seraient être 58
SFX zE être sois être 59
SFX zE être sois être 60
SFX zE être soit être 61
SFX zE être soyons être 62
SFX zE être soyez être 63
SFX zE être soient être 64
SFX zE être fusse être 65
SFX zE être fusses être 66
SFX zE être fût être 67
SFX zE être fussions être 68
SFX zE être fussiez être 69
SFX zE être fussent être 70
SFX zE être sois être 71
SFX zE être soyons être 72
SFX zE être soyez être 73
